Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB897.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 224A.112 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The infrastructure revolving fund shall be established in the State Treasury and
shall be administered by the authority. The fund shall be a dedicated fund, and all
moneys in the fund shall be allocated and dedicated solely to providing financial
assistance to governmental agencies, and investor-owned water utility systems as
provided for in KRS 96.540, 224A.306, 224A.308, and 224A.310, for the
construction or acquisition of infrastructure projects through an account designated
as the 2020 water service account.
(2) The broadband deployment fund shall be established in the State Treasury and shall
be administered by the office. The fund shall be a dedicated fund, and all moneys in
the fund shall be allocated and dedicated solely to providing grant funds to
governmental agencies and private sector entities to construct infrastructure for the
deployment of broadband service to households and businesses in underserved or
unserved areas of the Commonwealth through an account designated as the
broadband deployment fund.
(3) Funds in subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall not be commingled and shall
be used only for the stated purposes in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(4) The financial assistance which may be provided by the revolving fund shall be
limited to:
(a) Making loans, on the condition that the loans are made at or below market
interest rates, including interest free loans, at terms not to exceed thirty (30)
years and that the fund will be credited with all payments of principal and
interest on all loans;
(b) Purchasing or guaranteeing, or purchasing insurance for, local or state
obligations when the action would improve credit market access or reduce
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2523
interest rates;
(c) Providing a source of revenue or security for the payment of principal and
interest on bonds or notes issued by the authority or other agencies of the state
if the proceeds of the sale of the bonds will be deposited in the fund;
(d) Providing moneys with which to carry out the requirements of assistance
agreements; and
(e) Making grants as funds specifically appropriated for grants or proceeds from
the sale of the authority's revenue bonds are available.
(5) The revolving fund shall be established, maintained, and credited with repayments
and the fund balance shall be available in perpetuity for its stated purposes.
(6) The authority may provide financial assistance from the revolving fund to
supplement assistance provided from the federally assisted wastewater revolving
fund as created in KRS 224A.111.
(7) The authority shall advise governmental agencies of the availability of the
infrastructure revolving fund and how moneys may be obtained from the fund.
(8) The authority may enter into any necessary or required agreement with federal or
state agencies or persons to carry out the provisions of this section. All state
agencies shall cooperate with the authority and share information with the authority
as appropriate to accomplish the purposes set out in KRS 224A.300.
(9) Moneys in the broadband deployment fund are hereby appropriated for the purposes
set forth in this section and KRS 224A.1121.
(10) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any moneys remaining in the broadband deployment
fund at the close of the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into
the succeeding fiscal year to be used for the purposes set forth in this section and
KRS 224A.1121.
(11) Interest earned on moneys in the broadband deployment fund shall stay in the fund.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 3/4/2026 12:27 PM Jacketed